Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.415

Racial profiling—Reports to the legislature.

The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, in cooperation with the criminal justice training commission, shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2002, and each December 31st thereafter, on the progress and accomplishments of each local law enforcement agency in the state in meeting the requirements and goals set forth in RCW 43.101.410.

[ 2002 c 14 s 3.]

NOTES:

Declaration—Findings—2002 c 14: See note following RCW 43.101.410.